grammars/class.verbs.weighted.lexc
LEXICON V3aConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@0^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3bPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3cPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3dPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
[PERSIST]:yindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V3dConj ;

LEXICON V3dConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3IrrPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@neng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON V4aPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
[PERSIST]:yind^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V4aConj ;

LEXICON V4aConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@m^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~om^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V4bPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
[PERSIST]:yindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V4bConj ;

LEXICON V4bConj
[Irr]:+ninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[Imp]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~om^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;

LEXICON V5aPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@y^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V5bPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
[PERSIST]:~indi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V5bConj ;

LEXICON V5bConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~i^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
[Irr]:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON V5cPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~ey^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V6aPostBase
[RR]:ngerre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ngen^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@nj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@nginj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@nj^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ngeni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:ngimen^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:ngemeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V7aPostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@0^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@0^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:n^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:wirrinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON V8PostBase  
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@ngen^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;  
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@y^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@nginj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@y^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:~un^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:~uwirrinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 


LEXICON V9PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@an^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@i^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@anj^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:a^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:~angemeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V10PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:men^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:=imeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
[Irr]:~imeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;


LEXICON V11PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@men^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@minj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@meni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:mimen^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:meninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
[RR]:merre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
[PERSIST]:yindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;

LEXICON ReVerbs
@R.TENSE.NP@re[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@(r)e^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;                            ! go
@R.TENSE.P@re[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@wam^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@re[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@(r)ey^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
re[Imp]:(r)ay^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
re[Irr]:(r)ayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

LEXICON NonverbalPostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@minj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:nin^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:niwirrinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON IntransitiveVerbs
barlid:barlid^ V9PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bukme:bukme^ V3dPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! dry up
di:di^ V7aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                           ! be, be standing
djabd:djabd^ V9PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djabda:djabda^ V6aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! stick up
djalre:djal^ ReVerbs "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
djangdi:djangdi^ V7aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dowerre:dowerre^ V10PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kakre:kak^ ReVerbs "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! travel at night
karu:karu^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! dig (intr)
kerlk:kerlk^ V11PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
keyo:keyo^ V8PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                  ! lie down
kurre:kurre^ V10PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                              ! decieve, trick
kuwa:kuwa^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngeydi:ngeydi^ V7aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngomka:ngomka^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! swim 
ngudjwarre:ngudjwarre^ V11PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngukde:ngukde^ V5bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! defecate
0:0^ ReVerbs "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
rra:rra^ V6aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                       ! stand, come live in a place
wareyo:wareyo^ V8PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
wokna:wokna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! speak, talk, make sound
worrk:worrk^ V11PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! be full of food
woybukwo:woybukwo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
yikadjurre:yikadjurre^ V10PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
yo:yo^ V8PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                         ! lie
yongen:yo^ V6aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
babbulibu:babbulibu V4bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bolkbawo:bolkbawo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
borna:borna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
borndu:borndu^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djalkma:djalkma^ V5cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djare:djare NonverbalPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! want
djarrangbu:djarrangbu^ V4bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                ! sort
djumdo:djumdo^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
durndiwe:durndiwe^ V5bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                   ! cause to return, go back
gerremadbu:gerremadbu^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                ! wait for something to cook
karu:karu^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                      ! dig
kebngu:kebngu^ V3IrrPostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
kukwarrewo:kukwarrewo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
lowkma:lowkma^ V5cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
manjngu:manjngu^ V3IrrPostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
marnedjare:marnedjare NonverbalPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                 ! love, desire
nahnan:nahna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! look after, care for
ngeybu:ngeybu^ V4bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngorrma:ngorrma^ V5cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngu:ngu^ V3IrrPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! eat (something)
rawo:rawo^ V3dPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! combine, mix, add
rrurndiwe:rrurndiwe^ V5bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                 ! cause to return, go back
warlbu:warlbu^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! hunt, gather
warrewo:warrewo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! ruin, damage
